src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-ooqj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ǭʼj: # Noun 124 'eng /est ahi/fin' - full paradigm
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Nom: [ǭʼj, ǭj]
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Gen: [ǭʼj, ǭj]
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Par: [ǭʼjõ, ǭjõ]
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Dat: [ǭʼjõn, ǭjõn]
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Ins: [ǭʼjõks, ǭjõks]
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Ill: [ǭʼjõ, ǭjõ]
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Ela: [ǭʼjstõ, ǭjstõ]
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Nom: [ǭʼjd, ǭjd]
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Gen: [ǭʼjd, ǭjd]
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Par: [ǭʼjḑi, ǭjḑi]
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Dat: [ǭʼjdõn, ǭjdõn]
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Ins: [ǭʼjdkõks, ǭjdkõks]
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Ill: [ǭʼjži, ǭjži]
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Ela: [ǭʼjšti, ǭjšti]
